District of Columbia statutes.
6-641.10

Enforcement of zoning regulations.

(a)

The Mayor of the District of Columbia shall enforce the regulations adopted under the authority of this subchapter. Nothing contained in this subchapter shall be construed to limit the authority of the Mayor or Council of the District of Columbia to make municipal regulations which are not inconsistent with the provisions of this subchapter and the regulations adopted thereunder.

(b)

If, pursuant to rules issued pursuant to this subchapter, the Zoning Commission approves a zoning density increase for a commercial office building or structure with a floor area ratio that is greater than the floor area ratio permitted as a matter of right under the zoning regulations, the applicant who obtains the zoning density increase shall be required to comply with the housing requirements set forth in section 308b of the Comprehensive Plan, as such requirements may be amended.

June 20, 1938, 52 Stat. 801, ch. 534, § 11
Oct. 6, 1994, D.C. Law 10-193,§ 3(d), 41 DCR 5536
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
Section 308b of the Comprehensive Plan referred to in (b) is § 308b of Title 10 of the D.C. Municipal Regulations.
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 10-193 provided that no District element of the Comprehensive Plan for the National Capital shall take effect until it has been reviewed by the National Capital Planning Commission as provided in § 2-1002(a) and § 1-204.23.
1973 Ed., § 5-423.
1981 Ed., § 5-427.
Building regulations, power and duty of Council and Mayor to make and enforce, see § 1-303.04.